Wyoming, session 2025, HB0139.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-25-201(b)(iii), (iv) and by
creating a new paragraph (v) and by creating a new
subsection (n) is amended to read:

11-25-201. Pari-mutuel permits; fees and reports;
disposition of funds; enforcement of provisions.

(b) Every Wednesday following any pari-mutuel event,
the permittee shall:
HB0139

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0232

(iii) Pay an amount equal to one percent (1%) of
the total amount wagered attributable to historic
pari-mutuel events, shown by the report to the commission,
to be transferred by the commission to the county and the
city or town in which the permittee is located, in equal
shares, or to the county alone if the permittee is not
located within the boundaries of a city or town. The
county, city or town receiving an amount under this
paragraph may credit that amount to the state fair account
upon a majority vote of the county's, city's or town's
governing body; and

(iv) Pay an amount equal to one-quarter percent
(1/4%) of the total amount wagered attributable to historic
pari-mutuel events, shown by the report to the commission,
to be credited to the legislative stabilization reserve
account;. and

(v) Pay an amount equal to six percent (6%) of
the net proceeds from covered thoroughbred horserace
revenues, attributable to the interstate export of
HB0139

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0232
pari-mutuel simulcast signals, to be credited to the
general fund.

(n) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act,
upon request by a permit holder to approve its interstate
export of pari-mutuel simulcast signals of covered
thoroughbred horseraces, the commission may enter into an
agreement with any entity that is responsible for
administering the federal horseracing integrity and safety
act of 2020, 15 U.S.C. § 3051 et seq., to provide services
consistent with the enforcement of the horseracing
anti-doping and medication control program and the
racetrack safety program. For purposes of an agreement
entered into under this subsection and subject to the
availability of funds in the pari-mutuel account, there is
continuously appropriated to the commission the state's
proportionate share for the horseracing anti-doping and
medication control program and racetrack safety program
calculated under 15 U.S.C. § 3052(f)(1)(C). The commission
shall remit funds appropriated in this subsection to the
entity responsible for administering the programs in
accordance with federal law.

HB0139

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0232
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0139